Ohio, session 136, HB786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2907.321, 2907.322, and 2907.323 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2907.321. (A) No person, with knowledge of the character of the material or performance involved, shall do any of the following: (1) Create, reproduce, or publish any obscene material that has a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person as one of its participants or portrayed observers; (2) Promote or advertise for sale or dissemination; sell, deliver, disseminate, display, exhibit, present, rent, or provide; or offer or agree to sell, deliver, disseminate, display, exhibit, present, rent, or provide, any obscene material that has a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person as one of its participants or portrayed observers; (3) Create, direct, or produce an obscene performance that has a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person as one of its participants; (4) Advertise or promote for presentation, present, or participate in presenting an obscene performance that has a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person as one of its participants; (5) Buy, procure, possess, or control any obscene material, that has a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person as one of its participants; (6) Bring or cause to be brought into this state any obscene material that has a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person as one of its participants or portrayed observers. (B)(1) This section does not apply to any material or performance that is sold, disseminated, displayed, possessed, controlled, brought or caused to be brought into this state, or presented for a bona fide medical, scientific, educational, religious, governmental, judicial, or other proper purpose, by or to a physician, psychologist, sociologist, scientist, teacher, person pursuing bona fide studies or research, librarian, member of the clergy, prosecutor, judge, or other person having a proper interest in the material or performance. (2) Mistake of age is not a defense to a charge under this section. (3) In a prosecution under this section, the trier of fact may infer that a person in the material or performance involved is a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person if the material or performance, through its title, text, visual representation, or otherwise, represents or depicts the person as a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person. (C) Whoever violates this section is guilty of pandering obscenity involving a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person. If the offense involves a minor or an artificially generated depiction of a minor, a violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (6) of this section is a felony of the second degree. If the offense involves an impaired person, a violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (6) of this section is a felony of the third degree. A violation of division (A)(5) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or section 2907.322 or 2907.323 of the Revised Code, pandering obscenity involving a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person in violation of division (A)(5) of this section is a felony of the third degree. (D) As used in this section and sections 2907.322 and 2907.323 of the Revised Code, "impaired : (1) "Artificially generated depiction" means a visual depiction of an actual person that was created or edited by artificial intelligence or other computer-generated means and that a reasonable person would believe depicts or represents an actual person who is identifiable by the person's face, likeness, or other distinguishing characteristic. (2) "Impaired person" means a person whose ability to resist or consent is substantially impaired because of a mental or physical condition or because of advanced age, and the offender knows or has reasonable cause to believe that the other person's ability to resist or consent is substantially impaired because of a mental or physical condition or because of advanced age. Sec. 2907.322. (A) No person, with knowledge of the character of the material or performance involved, shall do any of the following: (1) Create, record, photograph, film, develop, reproduce, or publish any material that shows a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person participating or engaging in sexual activity, masturbation, or bestiality; (2) Advertise for sale or dissemination, sell, distribute, transport, disseminate, exhibit, or display any material that shows a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person participating or engaging in sexual activity, masturbation, or bestiality; (3) Create, direct, or produce a performance that shows a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person participating or engaging in sexual activity, masturbation, or bestiality; (4) Advertise for presentation, present, or participate in presenting a performance that shows a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person participating or engaging in sexual activity, masturbation, or bestiality; (5) Knowingly solicit, receive, purchase, exchange, possess, or control any material that shows a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person participating or engaging in sexual activity, masturbation, or bestiality; (6) Bring or cause to be brought into this state any material that shows a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person participating or engaging in sexual activity, masturbation, or bestiality; (7) Bring, cause to be brought, or finance the bringing of any minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person into or across this state with the intent that the minor or impaired person engage in sexual activity, masturbation, or bestiality in a performance or for the purpose of producing material containing a visual representation depicting the minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person engaged in sexual activity, masturbation, or bestiality. (B)(1) This section does not apply to any material or performance that is sold, disseminated, displayed, possessed, controlled, brought or caused to be brought into this state, or presented for a bona fide medical, scientific, educational, religious, governmental, judicial, or other proper purpose, by or to a physician, psychologist, sociologist, scientist, teacher, person pursuing bona fide studies or research, librarian, member of the clergy, prosecutor, judge, or other person having a proper interest in the material or performance. (2) Mistake of age is not a defense to a charge under this section. (3) In a prosecution under this section, the trier of fact may infer that a person in the material or performance involved is a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person if the material or performance, through its title, text, visual representation, or otherwise, represents or depicts the person as a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person. (C) Whoever violates this section is guilty of pandering sexually oriented matter involving a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person. If the offense involves a minor or an artificially generated depiction of a minor, a violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), or (7) of this section is a felony of the second degree. If the offense involves an impaired person, a violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), or (7) of this section is a felony of the third degree. Violation of division (A)(5) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or section 2907.321 or 2907.323 of the Revised Code, pandering sexually oriented matter involving a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person in violation of division (A)(5) of this section is a felony of the third degree. Sec. 2907.323. (A) No person shall do any of the following: (1) Photograph any minor or impaired person who is not the person's child or ward in a state of nudity, or create, direct, produce, or transfer any material or performance that shows the minor, an artificially generated depiction of the minor, or impaired person in a state of nudity, unless both of the following apply: (a) The material or performance is, or is to be, sold, disseminated, displayed, possessed, controlled, brought or caused to be brought into this state, or presented for a bona fide artistic, medical, scientific, educational, religious, governmental, judicial, or other proper purpose, by or to a physician, psychologist, sociologist, scientist, teacher, person pursuing bona fide studies or research, librarian, member of the clergy, prosecutor, judge, or other person having a proper interest in the material or performance; (b) The minor's or impaired person's parents, guardian, or custodian consents in writing to the photographing of the minor or impaired person, to the use of the minor, the artificially generated depiction of the minor, or impaired person in the material or performance, or to the transfer of the material and to the specific manner in which the material or performance is to be used. (2) Consent to the photographing of the person's child or ward who is a minor or impaired person, or photograph the person's child or ward who is a minor or impaired person, in a state of nudity or consent to the use of the person's child or ward who is a minor, an artificially generated depiction of the minor, or impaired person in a state of nudity in any material or performance, or use or transfer a material or performance of that nature, unless the material or performance is sold, disseminated, displayed, possessed, controlled, brought or caused to be brought into this state, or presented for a bona fide artistic, medical, scientific, educational, religious, governmental, judicial, or other proper purpose, by or to a physician, psychologist, sociologist, scientist, teacher, person pursuing bona fide studies or research, librarian, member of the clergy, prosecutor, judge, or other person having a proper interest in the material or performance; (3) Possess or view any material or performance that shows a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person who is not the person's child or ward in a state of nudity, unless one of the following applies: (a) The material or performance is sold, disseminated, displayed, possessed, controlled, brought or caused to be brought into this state, or presented for a bona fide artistic, medical, scientific, educational, religious, governmental, judicial, or other proper purpose, by or to a physician, psychologist, sociologist, scientist, teacher, person pursuing bona fide studies or research, librarian, member of the clergy, prosecutor, judge, or other person having a proper interest in the material or performance. (b) The person knows that the minor's or impaired person's parents, guardian, or custodian has consented in writing to the photographing or use of the minor, an artificially generated depiction of the minor, or impaired person in a state of nudity and to the manner in which the material or performance is used or transferred. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of illegal use of a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person in a nudity-oriented material or performance. If the offense involves a minor or an artificially generated depiction of a minor, whoever violates division (A)(1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a felony of the second degree. If the offense involves an impaired person, whoever violates division (A)(1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a felony of the third degree. Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates division (A)(3) of this section is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or section 2907.321 or 2907.322 of the Revised Code, illegal use of a minor, an artificially generated depiction of a minor, or impaired person in a nudity-oriented material or performance in violation of division (A)(3) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. If the offender who commits a violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of this section that involves a minor or an artificially generated depiction of a minor also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification as described in section 2941.1422 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term as provided in division (B)(7) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code and shall order the offender to make restitution as provided in division (B)(8) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 2907.321, 2907.322, and 2907.323 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.